Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1533
Reduction in force; noncompliance with federal or state law; how treated.

Notwithstanding sections 85-1530 to 85-1532, if the reduction of an employee based upon the provisions of such sections would place a community college area in noncompliance of any federal or state law or regulations requiring affirmative action employment practices, the area may vary from the provisions of such sections as necessary to comply with such laws or regulations.

Laws 1993, LB 239, § 55.